test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-myadoTS_gt-norm.yaml
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюдинзь, мякюдинзь]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюдинзь, мякюдинзь]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюнаць, мякюнаць]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюдаць, мякюдаць]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюдонзь, мякюдонзь]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядон
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядод
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядода
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядониʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядодиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядодиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядонаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядодаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядодоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядонась
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядодась
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядодась
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядонинзь
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядодинзь
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядодинзь
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядонаць
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядодаць
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядодонзь
     мяˮ+N+Tra: мяˮӈэ
     мяˮ+N+Car: мяциˮ
     мяˮ+N+Equ: мятремʼ
     мяˮ+N+Equ+Lat: мятревʼ
